Nevada, session 83, AB181.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 41 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a person is
immune from civil liability for returning a firearm to the owner of
the firearm at the termination of a firearm hold agreement.
2. A person is not immune from civil liability pursuant to
subsection 1 if the person engaged in unlawful conduct while
holding a firearm for the owner or returning the firearm to the
owner.
3. As used in this section, “firearm hold agreement” means a
written or oral agreement between an owner of a firearm and
another person in which the other person:
(a) Takes physical possession of the owner’s lawfully
possessed firearm at the request of the owner;
(b) Holds the firearm for an agreed period; and
(c) Returns the firearm to the owner according to the terms of
the agreement.
Sec. 2. NRS 202.2548 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.2548 The provisions of NRS 202.2547 do not apply to:
1. The sale or transfer of a firearm by or to any law
enforcement agency and, to the extent he or she is acting within the
course and scope of his or her employment and official duties, any
peace officer, security guard entitled to carry a firearm under NAC
648.345, member of the armed forces or federal official.
2. The sale or transfer of an antique firearm.
3. The sale or transfer of a firearm between immediate family
members, which for the purposes of this section means spouses and
domestic partners and any of the following relations, whether by
whole or half blood, adoption, or step-relation: parents, children,
siblings, grandparents, grandchildren, aunts, uncles, nieces and
nephews.
4. The transfer of a firearm to an executor, administrator,
trustee or personal representative of an estate or a trust that occurs
by operation of law upon the death of the former owner of the
firearm.
5. A transfer of a firearm pursuant to a firearm hold
agreement as described in section 1 of this act.
6. A temporary transfer of a firearm to a person who is not
prohibited from buying or possessing firearms under state or federal
law if such transfer:
(a) Is necessary to prevent imminent death or great bodily harm;
and
-
*AB181*

– 3 –
(b) Lasts only as long as immediately necessary to prevent such
imminent death or great bodily harm.
[6.] 7. A temporary transfer of a firearm if:
(a) The transferor has no reason to believe that the transferee is
prohibited from buying or possessing firearms under state or federal
law;
(b) The transferor has no reason to believe that the transferee
will use or intends to use the firearm in the commission of a crime;
and
(c) Such transfer occurs and the transferee’s possession of the
firearm following the transfer is exclusively:
(1) At an established shooting range authorized by the
governing body of the jurisdiction in which such range is located;
(2) At a lawful organized competition involving the use of a
firearm;
(3) While participating in or practicing for a performance by
an organized group that uses firearms as a part of the public
performance;
(4) While hunting or trapping if the hunting or trapping is
legal in all places where the transferee possesses the firearm and the
transferee holds all licenses or permits required for such hunting or
trapping; or
(5) While in the presence of the transferor.
Sec. 3. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to a cause
of action that accrues on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB181*